Hawaii statutes.
§338-20.5 Adoption; foreign born persons.
(a) The department of health shall establish a Hawaii certificate of birth for
a person born in a foreign country and for whom a final decree of adoption has
been entered in a court of competent jurisdiction in Hawaii, when it receives
the following:

(1) A properly certified copy of the adoption decree,
or certified abstract thereof on a form approved by the department; and

(2) A copy of any investigatory report and
recommendation which may have been prepared by the [director of human services];
and

(3) A report on a form to be approved by the
department of health setting forth the following:

(A) Date of assumption of custody;

(B) Sex;

(C) Color or race;

(D) Approximate age of child;

(E) Name and address of the person or persons
adopting said child;

(F) Name given to child by adoptive parent or
parents;

(G) True or probable country of birth.

The true or probable country of birth shall be
known as the place of birth, and the date of birth shall be determined by
approximation. This report shall constitute an original certificate of birth;
and

(4) A request that a new certificate of birth be
established.

(b) After preparation of the new certificate
of birth in the new name of the adopted person, the department of health shall
seal and file the certified copy of the adoptive decree, the investigatory
report and recommendation of the director of human services if any, the report
constituting the original certificate of birth, and the request for a new
certificate of birth. The sealed documents may be opened by the department
only by an order of a court of record or when requested in accordance with
section 578-14.5 or 578-15. The new certificate of birth shall show the true
or probable foreign country of birth, and that the certificate is not evidence
of United States citizenship for the child for whom it is issued or for the
adoptive parents. [L 1979, c 203, §3; am L 1990, c 338, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next